tests/Золотницкий.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    App: hfst-optimised-lookup
    Gen: ../chv.autogen.hfst
    Morph: ../chv.automorf.hfst

Tests:

  "Сӑмах Золотницкий":
    Золотницкий<np><cog><m><nom> :  Золотницкий 
    Золотницкий<np><cog><m><gen> :  Золотницкин 
    Золотницкий<np><cog><m><dat> :  Золотницкие 
    Золотницкий<np><cog><m><loc> :  Золотницкире 
    Золотницкий<np><cog><m><abl> :  Золотницкирен 
    Золотницкий<np><cog><m><ins> :  Золотницкипе 
    Золотницкий<np><cog><m><abe> :  Золотницкисӗр 
    Золотницкий<np><cog><m><ben> :  Золотницкишӗн
    Золотницкий<np><cog><m><px1sg><nom> :  Золотницкийӗм 
    Золотницкий<np><cog><m><px1sg><gen> :  Золотницкийӗмӗн 
    Золотницкий<np><cog><m><px1sg><dat> :  Золотницкийӗме 
    Золотницкий<np><cog><m><px1sg><loc> :  Золотницкийӗмре 
    Золотницкий<np><cog><m><px1sg><abl> :  Золотницкийӗмрен 
    Золотницкий<np><cog><m><px1sg><ins> :  Золотницкийӗмпе 
    Золотницкий<np><cog><m><px1sg><abe> :  Золотницкийӗмсӗр 
    Золотницкий<np><cog><m><px1sg><ben> :  Золотницкийӗмшӗн
    Золотницкий<np><cog><m><px2sg><nom> :  Золотницкийӳ 
    Золотницкий<np><cog><m><px2sg><gen> :  Золотницкийӳн 
    Золотницкий<np><cog><m><px2sg><dat> :  Золотницкийӳне 
    Золотницкий<np><cog><m><px2sg><loc> :  Золотницкийӳнте 
    Золотницкий<np><cog><m><px2sg><abl> :  Золотницкийӳнтен 
    Золотницкий<np><cog><m><px2sg><ins> :  Золотницкийӳпе 
    Золотницкий<np><cog><m><px2sg><abe> :  Золотницкийӳсӗр 
    Золотницкий<np><cog><m><px2sg><ben> :  Золотницкийӳшӗн
    Золотницкий<np><cog><m><px3sp><nom> :  Золотницкийӗ 
    Золотницкий<np><cog><m><px3sp><gen> :  Золотницкийӗн 
    Золотницкий<np><cog><m><px3sp><dat> :  Золотницкине 
    Золотницкий<np><cog><m><px3sp><loc> :  Золотницкийӗнче
    Золотницкий<np><cog><m><px3sp><abl> :  Золотницкийӗнчен
    Золотницкий<np><cog><m><px3sp><ins> :  Золотницкийӗпе 
    Золотницкий<np><cog><m><px3sp><abe> :  Золотницкийӗсӗр 
    Золотницкий<np><cog><m><px3sp><ben> :  Золотницкийӗшӗн
    Золотницкий<np><cog><m><px1pl><nom> :  Золотницкийӗмӗр 
    Золотницкий<np><cog><m><px1pl><gen> :  Золотницкийӗмӗрӗн 
    Золотницкий<np><cog><m><px1pl><dat> :  Золотницкийӗмӗре 
    Золотницкий<np><cog><m><px1pl><loc> :  Золотницкийӗмӗрте 
    Золотницкий<np><cog><m><px1pl><abl> :  Золотницкийӗмӗртен 
    Золотницкий<np><cog><m><px1pl><ins> :  Золотницкийӗмӗрпе 
    Золотницкий<np><cog><m><px1pl><abe> :  Золотницкийӗмӗрсӗр 
    Золотницкий<np><cog><m><px1pl><ben> :  Золотницкийӗмӗршӗн
    Золотницкий<np><cog><m><px2pl><nom> :  Золотницкийӗр 
    Золотницкий<np><cog><m><px2pl><gen> :  Золотницкийӗрӗн 
    Золотницкий<np><cog><m><px2pl><dat> :  Золотницкийӗре 
    Золотницкий<np><cog><m><px2pl><loc> :  Золотницкийӗрте 
    Золотницкий<np><cog><m><px2pl><abl> :  Золотницкийӗртен 
    Золотницкий<np><cog><m><px2pl><ins> :  Золотницкийӗрпе 
    Золотницкий<np><cog><m><px2pl><abe> :  Золотницкийӗрсӗр 
    Золотницкий<np><cog><m><px2pl><ben> :  Золотницкийӗршӗн
    Золотницкий<np><cog><m><pl><nom> :  Золотницкисем 
    Золотницкий<np><cog><m><pl><gen> :  Золотницкисен 
    Золотницкий<np><cog><m><pl><dat> :  Золотницкисене 
    Золотницкий<np><cog><m><pl><loc> :  Золотницкисенче 
    Золотницкий<np><cog><m><pl><abl> :  Золотницкисенчен 
    Золотницкий<np><cog><m><pl><ins> :  Золотницкисемпе 
    Золотницкий<np><cog><m><pl><abe> :  Золотницкисемсӗр 
    Золотницкий<np><cog><m><pl><ben> :  Золотницкисемшӗн
    Золотницкий<np><cog><m><px1sg><pl><nom> :  Золотницкийӗмсем 
    Золотницкий<np><cog><m><px1sg><pl><gen> :  Золотницкийӗмсен 
    Золотницкий<np><cog><m><px1sg><pl><dat> :  Золотницкийӗмсене 
    Золотницкий<np><cog><m><px1sg><pl><loc> :  Золотницкийӗмсенче 
    Золотницкий<np><cog><m><px1sg><pl><abl> :  Золотницкийӗмсенчен 
    Золотницкий<np><cog><m><px1sg><pl><ins> :  Золотницкийӗмсемпе 
    Золотницкий<np><cog><m><px1sg><pl><abe> :  Золотницкийӗмсемсӗр 
    Золотницкий<np><cog><m><px1sg><pl><ben> :  Золотницкийӗмсемшӗн
    Золотницкий<np><cog><m><px2sg><pl><nom> :  Золотницкийӳсем 
    Золотницкий<np><cog><m><px2sg><pl><gen> :  Золотницкийӳсен 
    Золотницкий<np><cog><m><px2sg><pl><dat> :  Золотницкийӳсене 
    Золотницкий<np><cog><m><px2sg><pl><loc> :  Золотницкийӳсенче 
    Золотницкий<np><cog><m><px2sg><pl><abl> :  Золотницкийӳсенчен 
    Золотницкий<np><cog><m><px2sg><pl><ins> :  Золотницкийӳсемпе 
    Золотницкий<np><cog><m><px2sg><pl><abe> :  Золотницкийӳсемсӗр 
    Золотницкий<np><cog><m><px2sg><pl><ben> :  Золотницкийӳсемшӗн
    Золотницкий<np><cog><m><px3sp><pl><nom> :  Золотницкийӗсем 
    Золотницкий<np><cog><m><px3sp><pl><gen> :  Золотницкийӗсен 
    Золотницкий<np><cog><m><px3sp><pl><dat> :  Золотницкийӗсене 
    Золотницкий<np><cog><m><px3sp><pl><loc> :  Золотницкийӗсенче 
    Золотницкий<np><cog><m><px3sp><pl><abl> :  Золотницкийӗсенчен 
    Золотницкий<np><cog><m><px3sp><pl><ins> :  Золотницкийӗсемпе 
    Золотницкий<np><cog><m><px3sp><pl><abe> :  Золотницкийӗсемсӗр 
    Золотницкий<np><cog><m><px3sp><pl><ben> :  Золотницкийӗсемшӗн
    Золотницкий<np><cog><m><px1pl><pl><nom> :  Золотницкийӗмӗрсем 
    Золотницкий<np><cog><m><px1pl><pl><gen> :  Золотницкийӗмӗрсен 
    Золотницкий<np><cog><m><px1pl><pl><dat> :  Золотницкийӗмӗрсене 
    Золотницкий<np><cog><m><px1pl><pl><loc> :  Золотницкийӗмӗрсенче 
    Золотницкий<np><cog><m><px1pl><pl><abl> :  Золотницкийӗмӗрсенчен 
    Золотницкий<np><cog><m><px1pl><pl><ins> :  Золотницкийӗмӗрсемпе 
    Золотницкий<np><cog><m><px1pl><pl><abe> :  Золотницкийӗмӗрсемсӗр 
    Золотницкий<np><cog><m><px1pl><pl><ben> :  Золотницкийӗмӗрсемшӗн
    Золотницкий<np><cog><m><px2pl><pl><nom> :  Золотницкийӗрсем 
    Золотницкий<np><cog><m><px2pl><pl><gen> :  Золотницкийӗрсен 
    Золотницкий<np><cog><m><px2pl><pl><dat> :  Золотницкийӗрсене 
    Золотницкий<np><cog><m><px2pl><pl><loc> :  Золотницкийӗрсенче 
    Золотницкий<np><cog><m><px2pl><pl><abl> :  Золотницкийӗрсенчен 
    Золотницкий<np><cog><m><px2pl><pl><ins> :  Золотницкийӗрсемпе 
    Золотницкий<np><cog><m><px2pl><pl><abe> :  Золотницкийӗрсемсӗр 
    Золотницкий<np><cog><m><px2pl><pl><ben> :  Золотницкийӗрсемшӗн
